North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Article 5. Revenue Bonds.

§ 159-80.
Short title; repeal of local acts.

This Article may be cited as “The State and Local Government Revenue Bond Act.”

It is the intent of the General Assembly by enactment of this Article to prescribe a uniform system of limitations upon and procedures for the exercise by all municipalities in North Carolina of the power to finance revenue bond projects through the issuance of revenue bonds and notes. To this end, all provisions of special, local, or private acts in effect as of July 1, 1973, authorizing the issuance of bonds or notes secured solely by the revenues of the projects for which the bonds or notes are issued or prescribing procedures therefor are repealed. No special, local or private act enacted or taking effect after July 1, 1973, may be construed to modify, amend, or repeal any portion of this Article unless it expressly so provides by specific reference to the appropriate section of this Article. It is further the intent of the General Assembly by enactment of this Article to provide an alternative and supplemental procedure for the exercise by the State of North Carolina of the power to finance revenue bond projects through the issuance of revenue bonds and notes.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 14; 1983, c. 554, ss. 1, 1.1.

Cross References.

As to issuance of capital appreciation bonds pursuant to The State and Local Government Revenue Bond Act, see

G.S. 159-100

et seq.

As to modification of authority of a city to issue revenue bonds under this Article, see

G.S. 160A-239.6

.

§ 159-81.
Definitions.

The words and phrases defined in this section shall have the meanings indicated when used in this Article:

“Municipality” means a county, city, town, incorporated village, sanitary district, metropolitan sewerage district, metropolitan water district, metropolitan water and sewerage district, county water and sewer district, water and sewer authority, hospital authority, hospital district, parking authority, special airport district, special district created under Article 43 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes, regional public transportation authority, regional transportation authority, regional natural gas district, regional sports authority, airport authority, joint agency created pursuant to Part 1 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, a joint agency authorized by agreement between two cities to operate an airport pursuant to

G.S. 63-56

, the North Carolina Turnpike Authority described in Article 6H of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes and transferred to the Department of Transportation pursuant to G.S. 136-89.182(b), and a Ferry Transportation Authority created pursuant to Article 29 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, but not any other forms of State or local government.

“Revenue bond” means a bond issued by the State of North Carolina or a municipality pursuant to this Article.

“Revenue bond project” means any undertaking for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, betterment, or extension of any one or combination of the revenue-producing utility or public service enterprise facilities or systems listed in this subdivision, to be financed through the issuance of revenue bonds, thereby providing funds to pay the costs of the undertaking or to reimburse funds loaned or advanced by or on the behalf of either the State or a municipality to pay the costs of the undertaking.A revenue bond project shall be (i) owned or leased as lessee by the issuing unit or (ii) owned by one or more of the municipalities participating in an undertaking established pursuant to Part 1 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes. If the revenue bond project is owned by one or more municipalities as provided in (ii) of this subdivision, any one or more of the participating municipalities may each be an issuing unit consistent with their agreement to establish a joint undertaking. In addition, any joint agency established by participating municipalities pursuant to Part 1 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes may be an issuing unit without owning the revenue bond project or leasing it as lessee.The cost of an undertaking may include all property, both real and personal and improved and unimproved, plants, works, appurtenances, machinery, equipment, easements, water rights, air rights, franchises, and licenses used or useful in connection with the undertaking; the cost of demolishing or moving structures from land acquired and the cost of acquiring any lands to which the structures are to be moved; financing charges; the cost of plans, specifications, surveys, and estimates of cost and revenues; administrative and legal expenses; and any other expense necessary or incident to the project.The following facilities or systems may be revenue bond projects under this subdivision:

Water systems or facilities, including all plants, works, instrumentalities and properties used or useful in obtaining, conserving, treating, and distributing water for domestic or industrial use, irrigation, sanitation, fire protection, or any other public or private use.

Sewage disposal systems or facilities, including all plants, works, instrumentalities, and properties used or useful in the collection, treatment, purification, or disposal of sewage.

Systems or facilities for the generation, production, transmission, or distribution of gas (natural, artificial, or mixed) or electric energy for lighting, heating, or power for public and private uses, where gas systems shall include the purchase and/or lease of natural gas fields and natural gas reserves and the purchase of natural gas supplies, and where any parts of such gas systems may be located either within the State or without.

Systems, facilities and equipment for the collection, treatment, or disposal of solid waste.

Public transportation systems, facilities, or equipment, including but not limited to bus, truck, ferry, and railroad terminals, depots, trackages, vehicles, and ferries, and mass transit systems.

Public parking lots, areas, garages, and other vehicular parking structures and facilities.

Aeronautical facilities, including but not limited to airports, terminals, and hangars.

Marine facilities, including but not limited to marinas, basins, docks, dry docks, piers, marine railways, wharves, harbors, warehouses, and terminals.

Hospitals and other health-related facilities.

Public auditoriums, gymnasiums, stadiums, and convention centers.

Recreational facilities.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-474, s. 36, effective November 29, 2001.

Economic development projects, including the acquisition and development of industrial parks, the acquisition and resale of land suitable for industrial or commercial purposes, and the construction and lease or sale of shell buildings in order to provide employment opportunities for citizens of the municipality.

Facilities for the use of any agency or agencies of the government of the United States of America.

Structural and natural stormwater and drainage systems of all types.

In the case of the North Carolina Turnpike Authority, a Turnpike Project, as defined in G.S. 136-89.181, including the planning and design of a Turnpike Project, that is designated by the Authority to be a revenue bond project.

Cable television systems.

“Revenues” include all moneys received by the State or a municipality from, in connection with, or as a result of its ownership or operation of a revenue bond project or a utility or public service enterprise facility or system of which a revenue bond project is a part, including (to the extent deemed advisable by the State or a municipality) moneys received from the United States of America, the State of North Carolina, or any agency of either, pursuant to an agreement with the State or a municipality, as the case may be, pertaining to the project.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1938, c. 2, s. 2; 1939, c. 295; 1941, c. 207, s. 2; 1951, c. 703, s. 1; 1953, c. 901, ss. 4, 5; c. 922, s. 1; 1965, c. 997; 1969, c. 1118, s. 1; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 15; 1975, c. 821, s. 2; 1977, c. 466, s. 3; 1979, c. 727, s. 4; c. 791; 1983, c. 554, ss. 2-2.2; 1985, c. 639, s. 3; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 976, s. 1; 1989, c. 168, ss. 37, 38; c. 643, s. 4; c. 740, s. 2; c. 780, s. 2; 1991, c. 508, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 644, s. 3; 1997-393, s. 3; 1997-426, s. 6; 2001-414, s. 48; 2001-474, ss. 36, 37; 2002-133, ss. 6, 7; 2009-527, s. 2(e); 2010-165, s. 14; 2011-84, s. 4; 2013-50, s. 5; 2017-120, s. 3.

§ 159-82.
Purpose.

The purpose of this Article is to establish a standard, uniform procedure for the financing by a municipality of revenue bond projects through the issuance of revenue bonds. Its provisions are intended to vest authority in and enable municipalities to secure and pay revenue bonds and the interest thereon solely out of revenues without pledging the faith and credit of the municipality.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 16.

§ 159-83.
Powers.

In addition to the powers they may now or hereafter have, the State and each municipality shall have the following powers, subject to the provisions of this Article and of any revenue bond order or trust agreement securing revenue bonds:

To acquire by gift, purchase, or exercise of the power of eminent domain or to construct, reconstruct, improve, maintain, better, extend, and operate, one or more revenue bond projects or any portion thereof without regard to location within or without its boundaries, upon determination (i) in the case of the State, by the Council of State and (ii) in the case of a municipality, by resolution of the governing board that a location wholly or partially outside its boundaries is necessary and in the public interest. The authority to exercise the power of eminent domain granted in this subdivision shall not apply to economic development projects described in G.S. 159-81(3)m., unless revenue bonds for the economic development project were approved by the Local Government Commission pursuant to

G.S. 159-87

prior to August 15, 2006.

To sell, exchange, transfer, assign or otherwise dispose of any revenue bond project or portion thereof or interest therein determined (i) in the case of the State, by the Council of State and (ii) in the case of a municipality, by resolution of the governing board not to be required for any public purpose.

To sell, furnish, and distribute the services, facilities, or commodities of revenue bond projects.

To enter into contracts with any person, firm, or corporation, public or private, on such terms (i) in the case of the State, as the Council of State and (ii) in the case of a municipality, as the governing board may determine, with respect to the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, extension, betterment, improvement, maintenance, or operation of revenue bond projects, or the sale, furnishing, or distribution of the services, facilities or commodities thereof.

To borrow money for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, extending, bettering, improving, or otherwise paying the cost of revenue bond projects, to issue its revenue bonds or bond anticipation notes therefor, in the name of the State or a municipality, as the case may be, and to pledge, mortgage, or grant a security interest in all or a portion of the real and personal property, whether owned or leased, comprising any revenue-producing utility or public service enterprise facilities or systems acquired, constructed, reconstructed, extended, bettered, or improved with the proceeds of the borrowing. Property subject to a mortgage, deed of trust, security interest, or similar lien pursuant to this subdivision may be sold at foreclosure in any manner permitted by the instrument creating the encumbrance, without compliance with any other provision of law regarding the disposition of publicly owned property. The granting of a lien on, or security interest in, hospital or health-related real or tangible personal property and the conveyance of this property pursuant to the provisions of the lien or security interest are not subject to the provisions of G.S. 131E-8, 131E-13, or 131E-14.

To establish, maintain, revise, charge, and collect such rates, fees, rentals, tolls, or other charges, free of any control or regulation by the North Carolina Utilities Commission or any other regulatory body except as provided in

G.S. 159-95

for the use, services, facilities, and commodities of or furnished by any revenue bond project, and to provide methods of collection of and penalties for nonpayment of such rates, fees, rentals, tolls, or other charges. The rates, fees, rentals, tolls and charges so fixed and charged shall be such as will produce revenues at least sufficient with any other available funds to meet the expense and maintenance and operation of and renewals and replacements to the revenue bond project, including reserves therefor, to pay when due the principal, interest, and redemption premiums (if any) on all revenue bonds or bond anticipation notes secured thereby, and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made by the State or the issuing municipality with the holders of revenue bonds issued to finance all or any portion of the cost of the project.

To pledge all or part of any proceeds derived from the use of on-street parking meters to the payment of the cost of operating, maintaining, and improving parking facilities whether on-street or off-street, and the principal of and the interest on revenue bonds or bond anticipation notes issued for on-street or off-street parking facilities.

To pledge to the payment of its revenue bonds or bond anticipation notes and interest thereon revenues from one or more revenue bond projects and any leases or agreements to secure such payment, including revenues from improvements, betterments, or extensions to such projects thereafter constructed or acquired as well as the revenues from existing systems, plants, works, instrumentalities, and properties of the projects to be improved, bettered, or extended.

(8a)

In the case of any county, city, town, or incorporated village, to make loans or advances to a municipality to provide funds to the municipality to pay any costs of any revenue bond project.
Funds received by a municipality in reimbursement of a loan or advance shall be distributed and restricted as provided in

G.S. 159-27.1

.

To appropriate, apply, or expend for the following purposes the proceeds of its revenue bonds, notes issued in anticipation thereof, and revenues pledged under any resolution or order authorizing or securing the bonds: (i) to pay interest on the bonds or notes and the principal or redemption price thereof when due; (ii) to meet reserves and other requirements set forth in the bond order or trust agreement; (iii) to pay the costs of the revenue bond projects authorized in the bond order, reimburse funds loaned or advanced for the costs of these revenue bond projects in accordance with the bond order, and provide working capital for initial maintenance and operation until funds are available from revenues; (iv) to pay and discharge revenue bonds and notes issued in anticipation thereof; (v) to pay and discharge general obligation bonds issued under Article 4 of this Chapter or under any act of the General Assembly, when the revenues of the project financed in whole or in part by the general obligation bonds will be pledged to the payment of the revenue bonds or notes.

To make and enforce rules and regulations governing the use, maintenance, and operation of revenue bond projects.

To accept gifts or grants of real or personal property, money, material, labor, or supplies for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, extension, improvement, betterment, maintenance, or operation of any revenue bond project and to make and perform such agreements or contracts as may be necessary or convenient in connection with the procuring or acceptance of such gifts or grants.

To accept loans, grants, or contributions from, and to enter into contracts and cooperate with the United States of America, the State of North Carolina, or any agency thereof, with respect to any revenue bond project.

To enter on any lands, waters, and premises for the purpose of making surveys, borings, soundings, examinations, and other preliminary studies for constructing and operating any revenue bond project.

To retain and employ consultants and other persons on a contract basis for rendering professional, financial, or technical assistance and advice and to select and retain subject to approval of the Local Government Commission the financial consultants, underwriters and bond attorneys to be associated with the issuance of any bonds and to pay for services rendered by underwriters, financial consultants or bond attorneys out of the proceeds of any such issue with regard to which the services were performed.

Subject to any provisions of law requiring voter approval for the sale or lease of utility or enterprise systems, to lease to or from any person, firm, or corporation, public or private, all or part of any revenue bond project, upon such terms and conditions as and for such term of years, not in excess of 40 years, (i) in the case of the State, as the Council of State and (ii) in the case of a municipality, as the governing board may deem advisable to carry out the provisions of this Article, and to provide in such lease for the extension or renewal thereof and, if deemed advisable, for an option to purchase or otherwise lawfully acquire the project upon terms and conditions therein specified.

To execute such instruments and agreements and to do all things necessary or therein in the exercise of the powers herein granted, or in the performance of the covenants or duties of the State or a municipality, as the case may be, or to secure the payment of its revenue bonds.

Any contract, agreement, lease, deed, covenant, or other instrument or document evidencing an agreement or covenant between bondholders or any public agency and the State or a municipality issuing revenue bonds with respect to any of the powers conferred in this section shall be approved by the commission.

In addition to the powers they may now or hereafter have, the State and each municipality shall have the following powers, notwithstanding any provisions of this Article to the contrary, in connection with the development of new and existing seaports and airports:

To acquire, construct, own, own jointly with public and private parties, lease as lessee, mortgage, sell, lease as lessor, or otherwise dispose of lands and facilities and improvements, including undivided interests therein;

To finance and refinance for public and private parties seaport and airport facilities and improvements that relate to, develop, or further waterborne or airborne commerce and cargo and passenger traffic, including commercial, industrial, manufacturing, processing, mining, transportation, distribution, storage, marine, aviation, and environmental facilities and improvements;

To secure any such financing or refinancing by all or any portion of its revenues, income or assets or other available moneys associated with any of its seaport or airport facilities and with the facilities and improvements to be financed or refinanced, and by foreclosable liens on all or any part of its properties associated with any of its seaport or airport facilities and with the facilities and improvements to be financed or refinanced, but in no event to create a debt secured by a pledge of its faith and credit.

In addition to the powers they may now or hereafter have, the State and each municipality shall have the following powers, notwithstanding any provisions of this Article or any other statute to the contrary, in connection with the development of facilities for the use of any agency or agencies of the government of the United States of America:

To acquire, construct, own jointly with public and private parties, lease as leasor or leasee, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of lands, facilities and improvements, including undivided interests therein and to do so, regardless of the provisions of any other statute, on such terms (i) in the case of the State, as the Council of State and (ii) in the case of a municipality, as the governing board may deem advisable to carry out the provisions of this subsection;

To finance and refinance facilities and related improvements for the use of any agency of the government of the United States of America;

To secure any such financing or refinancing by all or any portion of the revenue, income or assets or other available monies associated with such facilities and improvements to be financed or refinanced, and by foreclosable liens on all or any part of the facilities and improvements to be financed or refinanced, but in no event to create a debt secured by a pledge of its faith and credit.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-174, s. 39, effective November 29, 2001.

In addition to the powers they may now or hereafter have, each municipality has the power to finance and refinance the cost of water treatment facilities and related transmission mains, and their expansion and improvement, all or some portion of which may be located on land leased from an authority created under the provisions of

G.S. 162A-3.1

, for a term not less than the term of the obligations issued or otherwise incurred for the purpose. The authority may own or operate (or both) such facilities and mains and may contract with one or more of the political subdivisions that are members of the authority for operation of all or portions thereof. For this purpose, each municipality has, in addition to the powers it has under applicable law, all the powers under G.S. 162A-6(b) of an authority created under

G.S. 162A-3.1

, and the political subdivisions that are members of the authority and that contract with such municipality for a supply of water and a portion of the capacity of the water treatment facilities and mains shall have all the powers of political subdivisions under G.S. 162A-6(b) and

G.S. 162A-16

contracting with an authority created under G.S. 162A-3.1. This provision is supplemental to the other provisions of this Article.

History.

Ex. Sess., 1938, c. 2, s. 3; 1951, c. 703, ss. 2, 3; 1953, c. 922, s. 2; 1969, c. 1118, s. 2; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 17; 1983, c. 554, ss. 3-4; 1985, c. 723, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 795, s. 1; c. 933, s. 4; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 976, s. 2; 1989, c. 168, ss. 39, 40; 1991, c. 508, s. 2; 2001-474, ss. 38, 39; 2005-238, s. 4; 2005-249, s. 1; 2006-224, s. 3; 2006-259, s. 47.

Cross References.

For constitutional amendment permitting the General Assembly to grant to the State and other public bodies in the State additional powers to develop new and existing seaports and airports, see N.C. Const., Art. V, § 13.

§ 159-84.
Authorization of revenue bonds.

The State and each municipality is hereby authorized to issue its revenue bonds in such principal amount as may be necessary to provide sufficient moneys for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, extension, betterment, improvement, or payment of the cost of one or more revenue bond projects, including engineering, inspection, legal and financial fees and costs, working capital, interest on the bonds or notes issued in anticipation thereof during construction and, if deemed advisable by the State or a municipality, as the case may be, for a period not exceeding two years after the estimated date of completion of construction, establishment of debt service reserves, and all other expenditures of the State or the municipality, as the case may be, incidental and necessary or convenient thereto.

Subject to agreements with the holders of its revenue bonds, the State or each municipality, as the case may be, may issue further revenue bonds and refund outstanding revenue bonds whether or not they have matured. Revenue bonds may be issued partly for the purpose of refunding outstanding revenue bonds and partly for any other purpose under this Article. Revenue bonds issued to refund outstanding revenue bonds shall be issued under this Article and not Article 4 of this Chapter or any other law.

Refunding bonds may be issued at any time prior to the final maturity of the debt or obligation to be refunded. The proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds shall be applied only as follows: either, (i) to the immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded or (ii) if not required for the immediate payment of the obligations being refunded such proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded, and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with such refunding, but provision may be made for the pledging and disposition of any amounts in excess of the amounts required for such purposes, including, without limitation, provision for the pledging of any such excess to the payment of the principal of and interest on any issue or series or [of] refunding bonds issued pursuant to

G.S. 159-78

. Money in any such trust fund may be invested in (i) direct obligations of the United States government, or (ii) obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, or (iii) to the extent then permitted by law in obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government, (iv) certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in the State of North Carolina if such certificates shall be secured by a pledge of any of said obligations described in (i), (ii), or (iii) above having any aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of obligations being refunded but which shall not have matured and which shall not be presently redeemable or, if presently redeemable, shall not have been called for redemption.

The principal amount of refunding bonds issued pursuant to this section, together with the principal amount of refunding bonds, if any, issued under

G.S. 159-78

in conjunction with refunding bonds issued pursuant to this section, shall not exceed the amount set forth in

G.S. 159-78

.

History.

1953, c. 692; 1969, c. 1118, s. 4; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1977, c. 201, s. 3; 1983, c. 554, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to special assessmemts for critical infrastructure needs for counties, see Article 9A of Chapter 153A,

G.S. 153A-210.1

et seq.

As to special assessments for critical infrastructure needs for cities, see Article 10A of Chapter 160A,

G.S. 160A-239.1

et seq.

§ 159-85.
Application to Commission for approval of revenue bond issue; preliminary conference; acceptance of application.

Neither the State nor a municipality may issue revenue bonds under this Article unless the issue is approved by the Commission. The State Treasurer or the governing board of the issuing municipality or its duly authorized agent, as the case may be, shall file an application for Commission approval of the issue with the secretary of the Commission. If the issuing municipality is a regional public transportation authority, the application must be accompanied by a resolution of the special tax board of that authority approving of the application. The application shall state such facts and have attached to it such documents concerning the proposed revenue bonds and the financial condition of the State or the issuing municipality, as the case may be, and its utilities and enterprises as the secretary may require. The Commission may prescribe the form of the application.

Before he accepts the application, the secretary may require (i) in the case of the State, the State Treasurer or (ii) in the case of a municipality, the governing board or its representatives to attend a preliminary conference at which time the secretary and his deputies may informally discuss the proposed issue and the timing of the steps taken in issuing the bonds.

After an application in proper form and order has been filed, and after a preliminary conference if one is required, the secretary shall notify the State Treasurer or the municipality, as the case may be, in writing that the application has been filed and accepted for submission to the Commission. The secretary’s statement shall be conclusive evidence that the State or the municipality, as the case may be, has complied with this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-474, s. 39, effective November 29, 2001.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1938, c. 2, s. 9; 1949, c. 1081; 1967, c. 555; 1969, c. 688, s. 2; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 18; 1983, c. 554, s. 6; 1989, c. 168, s. 41; c. 740, s. 6; 2001-474, s. 39.

§ 159-86.
Approval of application by Commission.

In determining whether a proposed revenue bond issue shall be approved, the Commission may consider:

Whether the project to be financed from the proceeds of the revenue bond issue is necessary or expedient.

Whether the proposed project is feasible.

The State’s or the municipality’s, as the case may be, debt management procedures and policies.

Whether the State or the municipality, as the case may be, is in default in any of its debt service obligations.

Whether the probable net revenues of the project to be financed will be sufficient to service the proposed revenue bonds.

The ability of the Commission to market the proposed revenue bonds at reasonable rates of interest.

The Commission may inquire into and give consideration to any other matters that it may believe to have a bearing on whether the issue should be approved.

The Commission shall approve the application if, upon the information and evidence it receives, it finds and determines:

That the proposed revenue bond issue is necessary or expedient.

That the amount proposed is adequate and not excessive for the proposed purpose of the issue.

That the proposed project is feasible.

That the State’s or the municipality’s, as the case may be, debt management procedures and policies are good, or that reasonable assurances have been given that its debt will henceforth be managed in strict compliance with law.

That the proposed revenue bonds can be marketed at reasonable interest cost to the State or the municipality, as the case may be.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1983, c. 554, ss. 7, 8.

§ 159-87.
Order approving or denying the application.

After considering an application the Commission shall enter its order either approving or denying the application. An order approving an issue shall not be regarded as an approval of the legality of the bonds in any respect.

If the Commission enters an order denying the application, the proceedings under this Article shall be at an end.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-88.
Adoption of revenue bond order.

At any time after an application is filed with the Commission for the issuance of revenue bonds, (i) in the case of the State, the Council of State and (ii) in the case of a municipality, the governing board of the municipality may adopt a revenue bond order pursuant to this Article.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any city charter, general law, or local act, a revenue bond order may be introduced at any regular or special meeting of the governing board of a municipality and adopted at such a meeting by a simple majority of those present and voting, a quorum being present, and need not be published or subjected to any procedural requirements governing the adoption of ordinances or resolutions by the governing board other than the procedures set out in this Article. Revenue bond orders are not subject to the provisions of any city charter or legal act concerning initiative or referendum.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, no bond order authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds of the State shall be adopted by the Council of State until such time as the General Assembly shall have enacted legislation authorizing the undertaking of the revenue bond project to be financed and fixing the maximum aggregate principal amount of revenue bonds that shall be issued for such purpose, and such legislation shall have taken effect.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-474, s. 39, effective November 29, 2001.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 19; 1983, c. 554, s. 9; 1989, c. 168, s. 42; 2001-474, s. 39; 2012-156, s. 3.

§ 159-89.
Special covenants.

A revenue bond order or a trust agreement securing revenue bonds may be between the State or the issuing municipality and a bank or trust company located within or without the State of North Carolina, and may contain covenants as to any of the following:

The pledge of all or any part of revenues received or to be received from the undertaking to be financed by the bonds, or the utility or enterprise of which the undertaking is to become a part.

Rates, fees, rentals, tolls or other charges to be established, maintained, and collected, and the use and disposal of revenues, gifts, grants, and funds received or to be received.

The setting aside of debt service reserves and the regulation and disposition thereof.

The custody, collection, securing, investment, and payment of any moneys held for the payment of revenue bonds.

Limitations or restrictions on the purposes to which the proceeds of sale of revenue bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied.

Limitations or restrictions on the issuance of additional revenue bonds or notes; the terms upon which additional revenue bonds or notes may be issued and secured; or the refunding of outstanding or other revenue bonds.

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the percentage of revenue bonds the bondholders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given.

Events of default and the rights and liabilities arising thereupon, the terms and conditions upon which revenue bonds issued under this Article shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

The preparation and maintenance of a budget with respect to the expenses of the State or a municipality, as the case may be, for the operation and maintenance of revenue bond projects.

The retention or employment of consulting engineers, independent auditors, and other technical consultants in connection with revenue bond projects.

Limitations on or the prohibition of free service by revenue bond projects to any person, firm, or corporation, public or private.

The acquisition and disposal of property for revenue bond projects.

Provisions for insurance and for accounting reports and the inspection and audit thereof.

The continuing operation and maintenance of the revenue bond project or the utility or enterprise of which it is to become a part.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1938, c. 2, s. 6; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1983, c. 554, s. 10; 2003-388, s. 1.